Florida, session 2026, SB1636.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSubsection (9) of section 373.0693, Florida 19 Statutes, is amended to read: 20 373.0693âBasins; basin boards.â 21 (9)âAt 11:59 p.m. on December 31, 1976, a portion of the 22 Big Cypress Basin of the Ridge and Lower Gulf Coast District 23 which is being annexed into the South Florida Water Management 24 District by change of boundaries pursuant to chapter 76-243, 25 Laws of Florida, shall be formed into a subdistrict or basin of 26 the South Florida Water Management District. Such portion shall 27 be designated as the Big Cypress Basin. On or before December 28 31, 1976, The Governor shall appoint six not fewer than five 29 persons from Collier County and two persons from Lee County who 30 reside within the Big Cypress Basin residing in the area to 31 serve as members of the governing board of the basin, effective 32 at the time of transfer and subject to confirmation by the 33 Senate as provided in subsection (4). 34 (a)âThe initial boundaries of the Big Cypress Basin shall 35 be established by resolution of the governing board of Central 36 and Southern Florida Flood Control District, after notice and 37 hearing, and generally shall encompass the Big Cypress Swamp and 38 southwestern coastal area hydrologic cataloging unit, as 39 indicated on River Basin and Hydrologic Unit Map of Florida 40 1975, Florida Department of Natural Resources, Bureau of Geology 41 Map Series No. 72. 42 (b)âAt 11:59 p.m. on July 1, 2026, the governing board of 43 the South Florida Water Management District shall establish the 44 boundary of the Big Cypress Basin as the scientific boundary 45 recommended in the Big Cypress Basin Boundary Delineation study 46 that the district presented to the Legislature on January 12, 47 2021, except that the new basin boundary may include only 48 counties that have at least 25 percent of their jurisdictions 49 delineated within the boundary. 50 (b)âIf the governing board shall fail to establish the 51 initial boundaries on or before December 31, 1976, the initial 52 boundaries shall be the same boundaries as described for the Big 53 Cypress Basin of the Ridge and Lower Gulf Coast District. 54 (c)âThe governing board of the South Florida Water 55 Management District subsequently may change the boundaries of 56 the basin, but may not abolish the basin. 57 Section 2.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 58 373.503, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 59 373.503âManner of taxation.â 60 (3)âThe districts may levy ad valorem taxes on property 61 within the district solely for the purposes of this chapter and 62 of chapter 25270, 1949, Laws of Florida, as amended, and chapter 63 61-691, Laws of Florida, as amended. If appropriate, taxes 64 levied by each governing board may be separated by the governing 65 board into a millage necessary for the purposes of the district 66 and a millage necessary for financing basin functions specified 67 in s. 373.0695. 68 (b)âThe apportionment in The South Florida Water Management 69 District shall ensure that: 70 1.âThe apportionment within the district is be a maximum of 71 40 percent for district purposes and a maximum of 60 percent for 72 basin purposes; and 73 2.âThe basin ad valorem taxes levied within the counties 74 that comprise the Big Cypress Basin are used for projects and 75 flood control operations and maintenance within the counties in 76 which such taxes were collected, respectively. 77 Section 3.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 78 made by this act to section 373.503, Florida Statutes, in a 79 reference thereto, section 373.0697, Florida Statutes, is 80 reenacted to read: 81 373.0697âBasin taxes.âThe respective basins may, pursuant 82 to s. 9(b), Art. VII of the State Constitution, by resolution 83 request the governing board of the district to levy ad valorem 84 taxes within such basin. Upon receipt of such request, a basin 85 tax levy shall be made by the governing board of the district to 86 finance basin functions enumerated in s. 373.0695, 87 notwithstanding the provisions of any other general or special 88 law to the contrary, and subject to the provisions of s. 89 373.503(3). 90 (1)âThe amount of money to be raised by said tax levy shall 91 be determined by the adoption of an annual budget by the 92 district board of governors, and the average millage for the 93 basin shall be that amount required to raise the amount called 94 for by the annual budget when applied to the total assessment of 95 the basin as determined for county taxing purposes. However, no 96 such tax shall be levied within the basin unless and until the 97 annual budget and required tax levy shall have been approved by 98 formal action of the basin board, and no county in the district 99 shall be taxed under this provision at a rate to exceed 1 mill. 100 (2)âThe taxes provided for in this section shall be 101 extended by the county property appraiser on the county tax roll 102 in each county within, or partly within, the basin and shall be 103 collected by the tax collector in the same manner and time as 104 county taxes, and the proceeds therefrom paid to the district 105 for basin purposes. Said taxes shall be a lien, until paid, on 106 the property against which assessed and enforceable in like 107 manner as county taxes. The property appraisers, tax collectors, 108 and clerks of the circuit court of the respective counties shall 109 be entitled to compensation for services performed in connection 110 with such taxes at the same rates as apply to county taxes. 111 (3)âIt is hereby determined that the taxes authorized by 112 this subsection are in proportion to the benefits to be derived 113 by the several parcels of real estate within the basin from the 114 works authorized herein. 115 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.